Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 3 Placement, Transfer, and Transportation of Developmentally Disabled Persons Undergoing Habilitation, Generally

37-4-60.
Designation of facility to which client to be admitted; transfers of clients between private and state owned facilities; transfers of clients generally.

The department may designate the state owned or state operated facility to which a client is admitted under this chapter. The department may instead designate a private facility, approved under Code Section 37-4-8, to which the client is to be admitted,
if the department has obtained the prior agreement of the private facility and of the client or his representative.

A client who is receiving habilitation at a state owned or state operated facility under this chapter may apply for a transfer at his own expense to a private facility approved under Code Section 37-4-8, if he is able to pay for habilitation at such private
facility. If the private facility agrees to accept the client, the department shall transfer the client to that facility.

If a private facility requests the department to take custody of a client who has been receiving habilitation therein under this chapter and if the client meets the criteria for admission under this chapter, then the department shall accept the client
and designate the state owned or state operated facility to which the client shall be admitted.

When the needs of the client or efficient utilization of any facility requires, a client may be transferred from one facility to another, and notice of and the reasons for such transfer shall be provided pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 37-4-44.

History.
Ga. L. 1956, p. 728, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2510, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 88-2503.16, 88-2509.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 37.

37-4-61.
Transportation of clients generally.

The governing authority of the county where the client is found or located shall arrange for initial emergency transport of a client to an emergency receiving facility. Except as otherwise authorized under subsection (b) of this Code section, the governing
authority of the county of the client’s residence shall arrange for all required transportation for developmental disability services subsequent to the initial transport. The type of vehicle employed shall be determined by the
governing authority of the county, provided that, whenever possible, marked vehicles normally used for the transportation of criminals or those accused of crimes shall not be used for the transportation of clients. The court, upon
the request of the community developmental disability program, shall order the sheriff to transport the client in such manner as the client’s condition demands. At any time such community developmental disability program is satisfied
that the client can be transported safely by family members or friends, such private transportation shall be encouraged and authorized. In nonemergency situations, no female client shall be transported at any time without another
female in attendance who is not a client, unless such female client is accompanied by her husband, father, adult brother, or adult son.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, when a client is under the care of a facility, the facility shall have the discretion to determine the type of vehicle to safely transport the client and to arrange for such transportation
without the need to obtain the prior approval of the governing authority of the county of the client’s residence, the court, or the community developmental disability program. This subsection shall not prevent the facility from
requesting and receiving transportation services from the governing authority of the county of the client’s residence and shall not relieve the county sheriff of the duty of providing transportation. Persons providing transportation
are authorized to transport a patient from a sending facility to a receiving facility but shall not release the client under any circumstances except into the custody of the receiving facility. The use of physical restraints to
ensure the safe transport of the client shall comply with the requirements of Code Section 37-4-124. When transportation is not provided by the county sheriff, the expense of such transportation shall not be billed to the county
governing authority but may be billed to the client and, unless agreed to in writing by the facility, shall not be billed to or considered an obligation of the facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.17, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1067, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-6/HB 228.

Cross references.

Manner of marking of law enforcement and emergency vehicles, §

40-8-90

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-4-62.
Transfer of clients to custody of federal agencies for services; retention of jurisdiction over clients by state courts; jurisdiction over developmentally disabled persons in federal hospitals and institutions located in state.

If a client ordered to receive services from the department as a resident in a facility pursuant to this chapter is eligible for hospital care or treatment by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency, the department,
upon receipt of a certificate from such hospital showing that facilities are available and that the client is eligible for care, treatment, education, habilitation, or other specialized services therein, may transfer him to the
custody of such agency. No such transfer shall occur if it would be harmful to or less effective in the client’s habilitation or if it does not meet the requirements of the client’s individualized program plan. When any such person
is admitted under this Code section to any such facility within or outside the state, he shall be subject to the rules and regulations of such agency. The superintendent of any facility operated by such agency in which the individual
becomes a resident shall, with respect to such individual, be vested with the same powers and duties as the superintendent of facilities within this state with respect to all matters under this chapter. Jurisdiction is retained
in the appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the condition of such an individual, to determine the necessity for continuance of his care in said facility, and to order his release; and every such person shall
retain the rights delineated in Code Section 37-4-100. Every transfer of a client by the department pursuant to this Code section is so conditioned.

An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of another state, territory, or possession, or of the District of Columbia authorizing hospitalization of a developmentally disabled person by any agency of the United States shall have the same force and
effect as to the person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the order; and the courts of the state, territory, possession, or district issuing such order shall be deemed to have retained
jurisdiction of the person so hospitalized for the purpose of inquiring into his condition and determining the necessity for continuance of his hospitalization as is provided in subsection (a) of this Code section with respect
to clients ordered to receive services from the department by the courts of this state. Consent is given to the application of the law of the state, territory, possession, or district in which is located the court issuing the order
for hospitalization, with respect to the authority of the superintendent of any hospital or institution operated in this state by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency, to retain custody,
transfer, furlough, or discharge the person therein hospitalized.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-63.
Procedure for transfer of Georgia residents from out-of-state facilities to Georgia facilities.

Upon application to the department by a parent, spouse, next of kin, or guardian or by an agency of another state in which a person is hospitalized, the person shall be eligible to be admitted to a facility in the State of Georgia if found by the department
to be a legal resident of Georgia. The department shall designate a facility to which such person is to be transported at no expense to the State of Georgia. The regional state hospital administrator of such facility and the next of
kin or guardian of the person shall be notified of this action. The regional state hospital administrator shall be authorized to accept the person for a period not to exceed five days, unless prior to the expiration of such period
proceedings have been initiated under Code Section 37-4-42 for an order to receive services from the department. After a thorough physical and mental examination has been made by the medical staff of such facility, the regional state
hospital administrator of the facility or his designee is authorized to initiate a petition under this chapter, if this is necessary. Such application shall be forwarded to the court of the county in which that facility is located
for action pursuant to this chapter in relation thereto.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.8, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18.

37-4-64.
Procedure upon discovery that a client receiving court ordered services from a Georgia facility is not a resident.

If a client who is a resident in a facility is discovered not to be a resident of Georgia, the regional state hospital administrator of the facility in which the client is a resident shall seek his transfer to the custody of authorities of the state of
his residence or to a publicly owned or publicly operated facility in that state. This Code section shall not apply to persons who are in residence at any facility operated by or under the control of the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18.

Cross references.

Rights of citizens of other states while in Georgia generally, §

1-2-9

.